Missouri, session 2026, HB1829.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 71.948, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 71.948, to read as follows:
71.948. 1. If a municipality's general ordinances are not available online for
inspection without cost by the public, at least three copies of the published book shall be
kept on file in the office of the municipal clerk and kept available for inspection by the public
at all reasonable business hours.
2. If a municipality's general ordinances are available online for inspection
without cost by the public, at least one copy of the published book shall be kept on file in
the office of the municipal clerk and kept available for inspection by the public at all
reasonable business hours.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.